Tennessee, session 114, HB0605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-8-108(a)(4), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(4) Shall review, consider, and approve, as necessary, insurance policies
recommended by the division of claims that are designed to pay claims filed against the
state or its employees arising from contract or tort. This responsibility includes, but is
not limited to, the authority to facilitate the purchase of insurance for a state agency and
coordinate the purchase of insurance between and among various state agencies. For
the purposes of this subdivision (a)(4), the term "state agency" means each state board,
commission, committee, department, office, institution of higher education, or another
unit of state government.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0605
001843
- 1 -